test/src/morphology/N-krooipa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - krǭipa: # Noun 55 'eng /est kraap/fin' - full paradigm
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Nom: krǭipa
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Gen: krǭipa
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Par: krǭipõ
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Dat: krǭipan
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Ins: krǭipaks
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Ill: krǭipõ
     krǭipa+N+Sg+Ela: krǭipast
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Nom: krǭipad
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Gen: krǭipad
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Par: krǭipidi
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Dat: krǭipadõn
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Ins: krǭipadõks
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Ill: krǭipiž
     krǭipa+N+Pl+Ela: krǭipist
